test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-suoloj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - suolo: # N_CONTR_OU
    suolo+N+Sg+Nom: suolo
#    suolo+N+Sg+Nom: [suolo, suoloj]
    suolo+N+Sg+Gen: sullu
    suolo+N+Sg+Acc: sulluv
    suolo+N+Sg+Ill: sulluj
    suolo+N+Sg+Ine: sullun
    suolo+N+Sg+Ela: [sullust, sullus]
    suolo+N+Sg+Com: sullujn
    suolo+N+Pl+Nom: sullu
    suolo+N+Pl+Gen: sulluj
    suolo+N+Pl+Acc: sullujd
    suolo+N+Pl+Ill: sullujda
    suolo+N+Pl+Ine: sullujn
    suolo+N+Pl+Ela: [sullujst, sullujs]
    suolo+N+Pl+Com: [sulluj, sullujgum]
    suolo+N+Ess: sullun
    suolo+N+Abe: sulludak


#  Noun - suoloj: # N_CONTR_OJU
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Nom: suoloj
##    suoloj+N+Sg+Nom: [suoloj, sullu]
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Gen: sullu
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Acc: sulluv
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Ill: sulluj
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Ine: sullun
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Ela: sullust
#    suoloj+N+Sg+Com: sullujn
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Nom: sullu
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Gen: sulluj
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Acc: sullujd
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Ill: sullujda
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Ine: sullujn
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Ela: sullujst
#    suoloj+N+Pl+Com: sulluj
#    suoloj+N+Ess: sullun
#    suoloj+N+Abe: sulludak
